Oklahoma, session 2025, SB448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 29 O.S. 2021, Section 7-304, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 19, O.S.L. 2022 (29 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 7-304), is amended to read as follows:
Section 7-304. A. Except as otherwise provided by law, no
person may enter upon any state or federal wildlife refuge or
Wildlife Management Area with a dog, a gun, or a bow.
B. Exceptions to the above provisions are when the Oklahoma
Wildlife Conservation Commission and/or the Oklahoma Tourism and
Recreation Commission may by resolution permit:
1. The holding of field trials by duly authorized sportsmen’s
clubs; or

2. Such hunting, killing, or trapping of wildlife from such
refuge or Wildlife Management Area; provided, however, that Lake
Murray State Park shall not be utilized for the killing or trapping
of natural wildlife and shall remain a wildlife preserve.
C. 1. Upon authorization for the hunting, killing, or trapping
of wildlife from any such refuge or Wildlife Management Area by the
Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission pursuant to subsection B
of this section, the Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission shall
require nonresidents to schedule with the Department of Wildlife
Conservation in order to receive written authorization to use such
refuge or Wildlife Management Area.
2. The Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission shall create a
lottery system as needed for the distribution of permits authorizing
nonresidents to hunt, kill, or trap wildlife from such refuge or
Wildlife Management Area and shall charge a permit fee not to exceed
One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).
3. The Oklahoma Wildlife Conservation Commission shall
promulgate any rules necessary to implement the provisions of this
section.
D. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this
section shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Hundred
Dollars ($100.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or
by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than ten (10) days
nor more than thirty (30) days, or by both such fine and
imprisonment for the first violation. A subsequent violation shall
result in the suspension of privileges to hunt, kill, or trap within
such refuge or Wildlife Management Area.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 448 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 27th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 448 Page 3